Hawaii statutes.
[§322H-1] Hawaii health authority;
establishment. (a) There is established within the department of budget
and finance for administrative purposes the Hawaii health authority. The
authority shall be an autonomous public body corporate and politic and an
instrumentality of the State.

(b) The authority shall be composed of nine
members appointed by the governor as provided in section 26-34; provided that
three members shall be appointed from a list of nominees submitted by the
speaker of the house of representatives and three members shall be appointed
from a list of nominees submitted by the president of the senate. All members
shall be appointed for terms of four years each.

(c) One member shall be selected to be the
executive director and confirmed by a majority vote of a quorum of the members
of the Hawaii health authority.

(d) Each member shall hold office until the
member's successor is appointed and qualified.

(e) Five members shall constitute a quorum,
whose affirmative vote shall be necessary for all valid actions by the
authority. [L Sp 2009, c 11, pt of §2]

Attorney General Opinions

Subsection (d) is constitutional, with regard to the use of
the phrase "appointed and qualified" to describe when a successor's
appointment terminates a holdover member's position. Att. Gen. Op. 16-3.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next